District of Columbia statutes.
47-833

Unsubdivided tracts.

Whenever application is made in writing to the Assessor of the District of Columbia by the owner of any tract of land in said District not subdivided into lots and of record as a subdivision in the Office of the Surveyor of said District, for the redistribution of any general or special taxes or assessments then levied or due thereon, or whenever such application is made by the owner of any parcel of such tract for such redistribution, any such general or special taxes or assessments levied or due against the entire tract of which such parcel is a part shall be redistributed so that the owner of any such parcel may pay the proportion of such entire taxes or assessments equitably chargeable thereon.

History

Mar. 1, 1921, 41 Stat. 1196, ch. 95, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-833.
1973 Ed., § 47-715.

Editor's Notes

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.